New York, session 2025-2026, A2704.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2803-j of the public health law, 2 as amended by chapter 382 of the laws of 2022, is amended and a new 3 subdivision 1-f is added to read as follows: 4 1. The commissioner shall require that every hospital and birth center 5 shall prepare in printed or photocopied form and distribute at the time 6 of pre-booking directly to each prospective maternity patient, every 7 maternity patient that is cared for and discharged by a hospital or 8 birth center, and, upon request, to the general public an informational 9 leaflet. Such leaflet shall be designed by the commissioner and shall 10 contain brief definitions of maternity related procedures and practices 11 as specified in subdivision two of this section and such other material 12 as deemed appropriate by the commissioner. Hospitals and birth centers 13 may also elect to distribute additional explanatory material along with 14 the maternity patients informational leaflet. The commissioner shall 15 make the information contained in the leaflet available on the depart- 16 ment's website and shall present all annual statistical information 17 compiled pursuant to subdivision three of this section on the depart- 18 ment's website for the most recent five years for which such data is 19 available. 20 1-f. The information leaflet shall also include the immunization sche- 21 dule and recommendations for newborns established by the commissioner 22 pursuant to subdivision five of this section. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 25 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 26 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 27 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06429-01-5